Wisconsin, session 2025, SB104.
do enact as follows:SB104,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB104,27Section 2. 20.255 (2) (ef) of the statutes is created to read:SB104,2,10820.255 (2) (ef) Safe drinking water; grants. The amounts in the schedule for 9grants awarded to school boards, governing boards, and governing bodies under s. 10118.073 (6).SB104,311Section 3. 118.073 of the statutes is created to read:SB104,2,1212118.073 Safe drinking water. (1) In this section:SB104,2,1513(a) “Bubbler fixture” means a fixture on a drinking fountain through which 14water is forced up in a small arc from a nozzle that allows an individual to drink 15from the arc directly.SB104,2,1816(b) “Drinking fountain” means a plumbing fixture that is connected to the 17potable water distribution system and drainage system that allows a user to obtain 18a drink directly from a stream of flowing water without the use of any accessory.SB104,2,2019(c) “Filtered bottle-filling station” means an apparatus that meets all of the 20following requirements:SB104,2,21211. The apparatus is connected to customer site piping.SB104,3,2222. The apparatus filters water and is certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 53 1for lead reduction and perfluorooctanoic acid and perfluorooctane sulfonate 2reduction and NSF/ANSI standard 42 for particulate removal.SB104,3,433. The flow rate through the apparatus is paired to the specified flow rate of 4the filter cartridge.SB104,3,654. The apparatus has a light or other device to indicate filter cartridge 6replacement status.SB104,3,875. The apparatus is designed to fill drinking bottles or other containers for 8personal water consumption.SB104,3,996. The apparatus includes a drinking fountain.SB104,3,1310(d) “Filtered faucet” means a faucet that at the point of use includes a filter 11that is certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 53 for lead reduction and 12perfluorooctanoic acid and perfluorooctane sulfonate reduction and NSF/ANSI 13standard 42 for particulate removal.SB104,3,1514(e) “School” means a public school, including a charter school, or a private 15school.SB104,3,2316(2) (a) By no later than the first day of the 16th month after the effective date 17of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], the school board, governing board, or 18governing body that governs a school shall develop for the school a drinking water 19management plan, and make the plan available to the department, school staff, 20parents and guardians of pupils attending the school, and the general public, upon 21request. The school board, governing board, or governing body that governs the 22school shall ensure that a plan developed under this paragraph does all of the 23following:SB104,4,311. Specifies each location where a filtered bottle-filling station or filtered 2faucet will be maintained to deliver water for human consumption, whether as 3drinking water or as a component of a food or beverage.SB104,4,542. Specifies each location where a water outlet will be maintained for 5purposes other than human consumption.SB104,4,763. Specifies each location where a water outlet will be shut off or rendered 7permanently inoperable.SB104,4,1084. Provides for the maintenance of at least one filtered bottle-filling station for 9every 100 occupants of the school, not including visitors or individuals attending 10special events.SB104,4,14115. Provides for the installation of filtered faucets only when the installation of 12a filtered bottle-filling station is not feasible but a water outlet for human 13consumption is necessary, including in kitchens, nurses’ stations, and teachers’ 14lounges.SB104,4,15156. Provides a schedule for when each of the following will occur:SB104,4,2016a. Water sampling and testing of the filtered water at each filtered bottle-17filling station and filtered faucet in the school to ensure that the filters are properly 18installed and provide water that has a lead concentration of not more than 5 parts 19per billion and that does not contain perfluorooctanoic acid or perfluorooctane 20sulfonate at a level that exceeds a state or federal standard.SB104,4,2321b. The regular replacement of the filter cartridge for each filtered bottle-22filling station and filtered faucet in compliance with the manufacturer instructions 23or recommendations of the department.SB104,5,41(b) The school board, governing board, or governing body that governs a school 2shall review and update a plan developed under par. (a) at least once every 5 years 3and make changes as directed by the department or as needed to comply with this 4section.SB104,5,75(c) The school board, governing board, or governing body that governs a school 6shall comply with the schedules provided in the plan developed under par. (a) for 7the school.SB104,5,118(d) If the water sampling and testing required to be included in a school’s plan 9under par. (a) 6. a. indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of one part per 10billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, the school board, governing 11board, or governing body that governs the school shall do all of the following:SB104,5,14121. Immediately check the status of the filter at the filtered bottle-filling 13station or filtered faucet and replace the filter cartridge if the status light or other 14device indicates that replacement is or will soon be required.SB104,5,16152. Ensure the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet is properly 16installed.SB104,5,17173. Resample and retest the filtered water.SB104,5,20184. If water sampling and testing under subd. 3. indicates the presence of lead 19at a concentration of one part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per 20billion, do all of the following:SB104,5,2321a. Submit a copy of the test results and a document that lists the make and 22model of the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet and filter cartridge to 23the department.SB104,6,21b. Consult with the department and filtered bottle-filling station or filtered 2faucet manufacturer.SB104,6,83(e) If the water sampling and testing required to be included in a school’s plan 4under par. (a) 6. a. indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of more than 5 5parts per billion or the presence of perfluorooctanoic acid or perfluorooctane 6sulfonate at a level that exceeds a state or federal standard, the school board, 7governing board, or governing body that governs the school shall do all of the 8following:SB104,6,991. Immediately shut off or otherwise render inoperable the water outlet.SB104,6,13102. Post a conspicuous sign near the water outlet stating that the water outlet 11is inoperable because of high lead concentration or a high level of perfluorooctanoic 12acid or perfluorooctane sulfonate, whichever is applicable, and maintain the sign 13until the water outlet is returned to service under subd. 5.SB104,6,15143. Replace the filter cartridge in the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered 15faucet.SB104,6,16164. Resample and retest the water.SB104,6,20175. If water sampling and testing under subd. 4. indicates the presence of lead 18at a concentration of one part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per 19billion, return the water outlet to service and comply with the requirements under 20par. (d) 2. to 4.SB104,7,2216. If water sampling and testing under subd. 4. indicates the presence of lead 22at a concentration of more than 5 parts per billion or the presence of 1perfluorooctanoic acid or perfluorooctane sulfonate at a level that exceeds a state or 2federal standard, do all of the following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb104 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb104 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB104 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB104 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB104: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting